en: Compass scale units: Degrees; Degrees and mils; Mils; Other
lt-LT: Kompaso skalės vienetai: Laipsniai; Laipsniai ir miliradianai; Miliradianai; Kita
hr-HR: Jedinice skale kompasa: Stupnjevi; Stupnjevi i tisućiti (mil); Mil; Ostalo
sl-SI: Merske enote kompasa: Stopinje; Stopinje in miliradiani (mils); Miliradiani (mils); Drugo
zh-TW: 指南針刻度單位: 度; 度與密位; 密位; 其他
el: Μονάδες κλίμακας πυξίδας: Μοίρες; Μοίρες και μιλς; Μιλς; Άλλο
th: หน่วยมาตราส่วนของเข็มทิศ: องศา; องศาและมิล; มิล; อื่นๆ
de: Maßeinheiten des Kompasses: Grad; Grad und Strich (mils); Strich (mils); Sonstige
ro-RO: Unități de măsură busolă: Grade; Grade și miimi; Miimi; Altele
pt-BR: Unidades de escala da bússola: Graus; Graus e milésimos; Milésimos; Outro
es: Unidades de escala de la brújula: Grados; Grados y milésimas; Milésimas; Otro
pt-PT: Unidades de escala da bússola: Graus; Graus e milésimos; Milésimos; Outro
ko: 나침반 눈금 단위: 도; 도 및 밀스; 밀스; 기타
nl: Kompas schaaleenheden: Graden; Graden en mils; Mils; Overige
fi: Kompassin asteikon yksiköt: Asteet; Asteet ja piirut; Piirut; Muu
bg-BG: Единици на скалата на компаса: Градуси; Градуси и хилядни; Хилядни (mils); Друго
vi: Đơn vị thang đo la bàn: Độ; Độ và mil; Mil; Khác
sk-SK: Jednotky stupnice kompasu: Stupne; Stupne a dielce; Dielce; Iné
sv: Kompassens skalenheter: Grader; Grader och streck; Mil; Övrigt
ru: Единицы шкалы компаса: Градусы; Градусы и милы; Милы; Другое
ja: Compass拡大単位: 度; 度およびミル; ミル; その他
zh-CN: 罗盘刻度单位: 度; 度和密位; 密位; 其他
cs: Jednotky stupnice kompasu: Stupně; Stupně a dílce; Dílce; Ostatní
pl: Jednostki skali kompasu: Stopnie; Stopnie i tysięczne (mils); Mils; Inne
hu: Iránytű skálázási egységek: Fok; Fok és mil; Mil; Egyéb
da: Kompasskalaenheder: Grader; Grader og mils; Mils; Andet
nb: Kompass skala-enheter: Grader; Grader og mils; Mils; Annet
fr: Unités de l’échelle de la boussole: Degrés; Degrés et millièmes; Millièmes; Autre
tr: Pusula ölçeği birimleri: Derece; Derece ve mil; Mil; Diğer
it: Unità Compass della bussola: Gradi; Gradi e millesimi; Millesimi; Altro